Utah statutes.
53A-2-211.   Graduation credits.

(1)  A nonresident district shall accept credits toward graduation that were awarded by a school accredited or approved by the State Board of Education or a regional accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.

(2)  A nonresident district shall award a diploma to a nonresident student attending school within the district during the semester immediately preceding graduation if the student meets graduation requirements generally applicable to students in the school.

(3)  A district may not require that a student attend school within the district for more than one semester prior to graduation in order to receive a diploma.



Amended by Chapter 119, 1993 General Session

